Nevada, session 83, AB478.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3.3. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the board of county commissioners adopts an ordinance
restricting the hours in which construction work may begin, the
hours for construction work on any project that is more than 300
feet from an occupied residential unit must be allowed to begin by
5 a.m. during the period beginning on April 1 and ending on
September 30.
2. As used in this section, “residential unit” means a single-
family residence or an individual residential unit within a larger
building, including, without limitation, a condominium,
townhouse, duplex or other multifamily dwelling. The term does
not include a time share or other unit that is subject to the
provisions of chapter 119A of NRS.
Sec. 3.5. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the governing body of a city adopts an ordinance
restricting the hours in which construction work may begin, the
hours for construction work on any project that is more than 300
feet from an occupied residential unit must be allowed to begin by
5 a.m. during the period beginning on April 1 and ending on
September 30.
2. As used in this section, “residential unit” means a single-
family residence or an individual residential unit within a larger
building, including, without limitation, a condominium,
townhouse, duplex or other multifamily dwelling. The term does
not include a time share or other unit that is subject to the
provisions of chapter 119A of NRS.
Sec. 3.6. NRS 116.347 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.347 1. If [, in a county whose population is 700,000 or
more,] the governing body of a county or city in which a declarant-
controlled common-interest community is located adopts an
ordinance restricting the hours in which construction work may
begin, the executive board shall not and the governing documents
must not restrict the hours that construction work may begin in the
declarant-controlled common-interest community during the period
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
beginning on April 1 and ending on September 30 to hours other
than those set forth in the ordinance.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not preclude the executive
board or the governing documents from restricting the hours that
construction work may begin:
(a) If a governing body of a county or city has not adopted an
ordinance restricting the hours in which construction work may
begin; or
(b) During the period beginning on October 1 and ending on
March 31.
[3. If, in a county whose population is less than 700,000, the
governing body of a county or city in which a declarant-controlled
common-interest community is located adopts an ordinance
restricting the hours in which construction work may begin, the
executive board shall not and the governing documents must not
restrict the hours that construction work may begin in the declarant-
controlled common-interest community during the period beginning
on May 1 and ending on September 30 to hours other than those set
forth in the ordinance.
4. The provisions of subsection 3 do not preclude the executive
board or the governing documents from restricting the hours that
construction work may begin:
(a) If a governing body of a county or city has not adopted an
ordinance restricting the hours in which construction work may
begin; or
(b) During the period beginning on October 1 and ending on
April 30.]
Sec. 3.7. 1. If, on the effective date of this act, the board of
county commissioners or the governing body of a city has adopted
an ordinance restricting the hours in which construction work may
begin and the ordinance does not allow construction work more than
300 feet from an occupied residential unit to begin by 5 a.m. during
the period beginning on April 1 and ending on September 30, the
ordinance is void and unenforceable.
2. If, on the effective date of this act, any provision in a
governing document of an executive board of a common-interest
community or a plan approved pursuant to chapter 278A of NRS is
more restrictive than the provisions of this act, such provision is
void and unenforceable.
3. As used in this section, “residential unit” means a single-
family residence or an individual residential unit within a larger
building, including, without limitation, a condominium, townhouse,
duplex or other multifamily dwelling. The term does not include a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
time share or other unit that is subject to the provisions of chapter
119A of NRS.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)